Oklahoma, session 2026, SB146.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 1, Chapter 165, O.S.L.
2022 (74 O.S. Supp. 2024, Section 9101), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 9101. A. The Department of Public Safety shall
establish and maintain a Mental Wellness Division to provide mental
wellness services and programs to public safety personnel and
retirees thereof to promote good mental wellness. The Commissioner
of Public Safety shall appoint the Director of the Mental Wellness
Division.
B. The Director of the Mental Wellness Division shall report to
the Commissioner. All current and former employees of the Mental
Wellness Division shall maintain the privacy of all public safety
personnel served by the Division or who participate in its programs.
No privileged personal health information shall ever be shared with

the Commissioner or made public without the consent of that person.
However, aggregate mental health information may be shared with the
Commissioner. Aggregate mental health information may be made
public by the Commissioner if, in the judgment of the Commissioner,
doing so could improve public safety mental wellness policies for
public safety personnel and the information is made public for this
sole purpose. Provided, no aggregate mental health information may
be shared or made public if doing so could reveal otherwise
privileged personal mental health information about any specific
individual. It shall be the duty of the Director of the Division to
establish the necessary policies and procedures to ensure the
privacy and confidentiality requirements of this section and of all
other applicable health privacy laws. Any breach of the privacy
provisions of this section and of any other applicable health
privacy laws must be timely and thoroughly investigated and the
appropriate disciplinary and corrective actions taken.
C. The Mental Wellness Division is authorized to enter into
partnerships with private entities to fulfill its mandate.
D. The offices, records, communications, information
technology, equipment, and any other resources of the Mental
Wellness Division shall be located and maintained separately from
that of the other divisions within the Department.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY Section 2, Chapter 165, O.S.L.
2022 (74 O.S. Supp. 2024, Section 9102), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 9102. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a
revolving fund for the Department of Public Safety on behalf of the
Mental Wellness Division of the Department of Public Safety to be
designated the “Mental Wellness Division Revolving Fund”. The fund
shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations,
and shall consist of those monies appropriated to the fund by law or
deposited in the fund as provided pursuant to the provisions of
Section 3 of this act 9103 of this title. All monies accruing to
the credit of the fund are hereby appropriated and may be budgeted
and expended by the Mental Wellness Division for the purpose of
providing mental wellness services and programs to public safety
personnel and retirees thereof. Expenditures from the fund shall be
made upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer against claims
ENR. S. B. NO. 146 Page 2

filed as prescribed by law with the Director of the Office of
Management and Enterprise Services for approval and payment.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. S. B. NO. 146 Page 3

Passed the Senate the 22nd day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 22nd day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 146 Page 4